District of Columbia statutes.
42-2704.07

No limitation, alteration, or impairment of rights and remedies of bondholders and noteholders.

The District pledges to the holders of any bonds or notes issued under this chapter that the District will not limit or alter rights vested in the Agency to fulfill agreements made with the holders thereof, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such holders until the bonds and notes, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of such holders are fully met and discharged. The Agency is authorized to include this pledge of the District in any agreement with the holders of bonds or notes.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 407, 25 DCR 5008

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2137.
1973 Ed., § 45-1922.